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CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC 15 Throttle Control Motor Circuit Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Throttle control motor is operated by the engine ECU and it opens and closes the throttle valve.
The fully opening of the throttle valve is detected by the throttle fully open position switch which is mounted
on the throttle body.
If this DTC is stored, the engine ECU shuts down the power for the throttle control motor.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

O h t ith ttl t l t i i t

SOpenorshort in throttlecontrolmotorcircuit
SThrottle control motor

15

Openorshort in throttlecontrolmotorcircuit SThrottlecon trol motor
SThrottlevalve
S Throttle drive gear

15

Open or short in throttle full switch circuit

SThrottledrivegea r
SDiesel throttlebody
SEngineECU

WIRING DIAGRAM



A09818

Signal Waveform

10 V/
Division

GND

0.5 msec./Division

A16946

1 2 3
4 5 6

Ohmmeter

DI−24
−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE (European Spec.)

1HD−FTE ENGINE SUP (RM896E)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using hand−held tester, as freeze frame records the engine conditions when a mal-
function is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was running or
stopped, the engine was warmed up or not, etc. at the time of the malfunction.

1 Check throttle control motor circuit.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect t he oscilloscope bet ween t er m inals LU+ A,

LU+B, LU−A, LU−B and E01 of the engine ECU.
(b) Start the engine.
CHECK:
Check the waveform between terminals LU+A, LU+B, LU−A,
LU−B and E01 of the engine ECU when the engine is racing.
OK:

The correct waveforms are as shown.

OK Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .

NG

2 Check throttle control motor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the throttle control motor connector.
CHECK:
S Measure the resistance between terminals 1, 3 and 2 of

the throttle control motor.
S Measure the resistance between terminals 4, 6 and 5 of

the throttle control motor.
OK:

Resistance: 18 − 22 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

NG Replace diesel throttle body assembly (See
page ED−1).

OK
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3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between throttle control mo-
tor and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU (See Pub. No.
RM617EonpageED −16).


